Utah statutes.
53A-11a-201.   Bullying, cyber-bullying, harassment, hazing, sexual battery, and sexual exposure prohibited.

(1)  No school employee or student may engage in bullying or harassing a school employee or student:

(a)  on school property;

(b)  at a school related or sponsored event;

(c)  on a school bus;

(d)  at a school bus stop; or

(e)  while the school employee or student is traveling to or from a location or event described in Subsections (1)(a) through (d).

(2)  No school employee or student may engage in hazing or cyber-bullying a school employee or student at any time or in any location.

